Idaho statutes. Title 1 COURTS AND COURT OFFICIALS
Chapter 10
CLERK OF THE DISTRICT COURT

Section.

§ 1-1001. Duties of clerk.

The clerk of the district court must perform such duties as are prescribed in the Code of Civil Procedure and in the Penal Code, and such duties as may be required of him by the rules and practice of the court.

§ 1-1002. Attendance on court — Deputy must act in clerk’s name.

The clerk must in person or by deputy attend every term of the district court held in his county. All acts done and process issued by the deputy must be in the name of his principal.

§ 1-1003. Liability for neglect or omission.

For any wrongful act or omission to perform any duty imposed by law, by himself or his deputy, the clerk is liable on his official bond to any person injured.